Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1216
Person responsible for subject's individualized treatment plan; periodic progress reports; copies; filed and served.

The person or entity designated by the mental health board under section 71-1215 to prepare and oversee the subject's individualized treatment plan shall submit periodic reports to the mental health board of the subject's progress under such plan and any modifications to the plan. The mental health board may distribute copies of such reports to other interested parties as permitted by law. With respect to a subject ordered by the mental health board to receive inpatient treatment, such initial report shall be filed with the mental health board for review and inclusion in the subject's file and served upon the county attorney, the subject, the subject's counsel, and the subject's legal guardian or conservator, if any, no later than ten days after submission of the subject's individualized treatment plan. With respect to each subject committed by the mental health board, such reports shall be so filed and served no less frequently than every ninety days for a period of one year following submission of the subject's individualized treatment plan and every six months thereafter.

Laws 2006, LB 1199, § 72.